CONSTITUTION OF’ THE TURKISH REPUBLIC - 1961
PREAMBLE

Having enjoyed freedom, and fought for her rights and liberties throughout
her history, and having achieved the Revolution of May 27, 1960 by exercising her
right to resist theoppression of a political power which had deteriorated into a state
of lllegitimacy through behavior and actions contrary tothe rule of law and the
Constitution. the Turkish Nation. prompted and inspired by the spirit of Turkish
nationalism. which unites all individuals. be it in fate, pride or distress, in a common
bong-.213 an indivisible whole around national consciousness and aspirations, and
which has as its aim always to exalt our nation in a spirit of national unity as a
respected member of the community of the world of nations enjoying equal rights
and privileges;

With full dedication to the principle nf irpeace at home. peace in the world»
and with full dedication to the spirit of national independence. and sovereignty and
to the reforms of Ataturk;

Guided by the desire to establish a democratic rule of law based on juridical
and social foundations, which will ensure and guarantee human rights and liberties,
national solidarity. social justice, and the welfare and prosperity of the individual and
society;

Now therefore. the Turkish Nation hereby enacts and proclaims this Constitution
drafted by the Constituent Assembly of the Turkish Republic, and entrusts it to the
vigilance of her sons and daughters who are devoted to the concepts of freedom,
justice and integrity, with the convinction that its basic guarantee lies in the hearts
and minds of her citizens.

PART ONE
General Principles

1. Form of the State

ARTICLE 1 - The Turkish State is a Republic.

II. Characteristics of the Republic

ARTICLE 2 - The Turkish Republic is a nationalistic, democratic, secuiar
and social State governed by the rule of law, based on human rights and the funda-
mental tenets sct forth in the preamble.

This Constitution was promulgated as law number 834 of July 9, 1961 in the
Official Gazette number 10859 of July 20, 1961.




III. Indivisibility of the State; its official language and its seat of go-
rernment.

ARTICLE 3 - The Turkish State is an indivisible whole comprising its

territory and people. Its official language is Turkish.
Its capital is the city of Ankara.
V IV. Sovereignty

ARTICLE 4 - Sovereignty is vested in the nation without reservation and
condition.

The nation shall exercise its sovereignty through the authorized agencies as
prescribed by the principles laid down in the Constitution.

The right to exercise such sovereignty shall not be delegated to any one person,
group or class. No person or agency shall exercise any state authority which does
not drive its origin from the Constitution.

V. Legislative power

ARTICLE 5 - Legislative power is vested in the Turkish Grand National
Assembly. This power shall not be delegated.

VI. Executive Function
ARTICLE 6 - The executive function shall be carried out by the President
of the Republic and the Council of Ministers within the framework of law.

VII. Judicial 'power

ARTICLE 7 ~ Judicial power shall be exercised by independent courts on
behalf of the Turkish nation.

VIII. Supremacy and binding force of the Constitution:

ARTICLE 8 - Laws shall not be in conflict with the Constitution.

The provisions of the Constitution shall be the fundamental legal principles
binding the legislative, executive and judicial organs, administrative authorities and
individuals.

IX. Irrevocability of the form of the State: .. . _ 7 _. .__ ,. I

ARTICLE 9' ~ The proviSIOn of the-Constitution establishing the form oi‘the
state as a republic shall not He amended nor shall any motion therefor be made.-




PART TWO
Fundamental. rights and duties
SECTION ONE
General Provisions
I. The nature of the fundamental rights and their protection:

ARTICLE 10 - Every individual is entitled, in virtue of his existence as a
human being to fundamental rights and freedoms, which cannot be usurped. trans-
ferred or relinquished.

The State shall remove all political, economic and social obstacles that restrict
the fundamental rights and freedoms of the individual in such a wayas to be irre-
concilable with the principlesembodied in the rule of law. individual well-being and
social justice. The State prepares the conditions required for the development of the
individual's material and spiritual existence.

II. The essence of the basic rights:

ARTICLE 11 - The fundamental rights and freedoms shall be restricted by
law only in conformity with the letter and spirit of the Constitution.

The law shall not infringe upon the essence of any right or liberty not even'
when it is applied for the purpose of upholding public interest, morals and order,
social justice as well as national security.

III. Equality:

ARTICLE 12 - All individuals are equal before the law irrespective of lan-
guage, race. sex, political opinion, philosophical views, or religion or religious sect.

No privileges shall be granted to any individual, family, group or class.

IV. The status of aliens:

ARTICLE 13 - The rights and liberties of aliens referred to in this section
shall be defined according to the provisions of international law.

SECTION TWO
The rights and duties of the individual

I. Personal immunities:

ARTICLE 14 - Every individual shall enjoy the right to seek to improve
ihimself materially and spiritually, and have the benefit of personal freedom.

The immunities and freedoms enjoyed by the individual shall not be restricted
except in cases explicitly prescribed by law, and in conformance with judgments
«duly passed by a court.

No individual shall be subjected to ill-treatment or torture.

No punishment incompatible with human dignity shall be imposed.
http://www.newocr.com/




II. Protection of individual primacy

a) The privacy of the indicidual’s life:

ARTICLE 15 - The privacy of the individual’s life shall not be violated.
The exceptions required as a result of legal proceedings shall be reserved.

Unless there exists a judgment duly passed by a court in cases explicitly pro-
vided by law. and unless there exists an order of an agency authorised by law in.
cases required by public order. neither the person nor the private papers and belon-
gings of an individual shall be searched.

b) Immunity of domicile

ARTICLE 16 - The privacy of the individual’s home shall not be violated.

Unless there exists a court judgment duly passed in cases- explicitly provided
by law, and unless there exists an order of an agency authorized by law in cases
where delays are deemed dangerous to national security and public order, no domicile
shall be entered or searched, or the furniture and property therein confiscated.

0) Freedom of communication:

ARTICLE 17 - Every individual is entitled to the right of free communi-
cation.

The privacy of communication is essential and shall not be infringed unless
there exists a court judgment duly passed in cases required by law.

III. Freedom of travel and residence:

ARTICLE 18 - Every individual shall be entitled to travel freely: this-
freedom can be restricted only by law for the purposes of maintaining national
security or for preventing epidemics.

Every individual shall be entitled to reside wherever he choses. The freedom
can be limited only by laws when necessary to maintain national security, to prevent
epidemics. to protect public property, and to achieve social and economic and
agricultural development.

Turkish citizens shall be free to leave and re-enter Turkey. The freedom to
leave Turkey shall be regulated by law.

IV. The rights and freedoms of thought and belief:

a) Freedom of thought and faith:

ARTICLE 19 - Every individual is entitled to follow freely the dictates of
his conscience, to chose his own religious faith and to have his own opinions.

Forms of worship, and religious ceremonies and rites are free provided they
are not in Opposition to public order, or morals or to the laws enacted to uphold them.

No person shall be. compelled to worship, or participate in religious ceremonies
and rites, or to reveal his religious faith and belief. N 0 person shall be reproached for
his religoous faith and belief.
http://www.newocr.com/



Religious education and teaching shall be subject to the individual’s own will

and volition, and in- the'case of minors. to their legally appointed guardians.
No person shall be allowed to exploit and abuse. religion or religious feelings or
things considered sacred by religion in any ”manner "whatsoever for the purpose of
political. Or personal benefit, Or for gaining power, or for even partially basing the
fundamental social, economic, political and legal order of the State on religious dog-
mas. Those who violate this prohibition',"or those who induce others to do 'so shall be
punishable under the pertinent lawstn the case of associations andfpolitical parties
the former shall be permanently closeddownby .order of authorized courts and the
latter by order of the Constitutional Court.

2)) Freedom‘of thought: v ‘ ~ 1 ' .- - ' - " 5

ARTICLEJVZ'O, - Every individual is entitled to have his'own opinions and to
think freely. Hewis free to express his thoughts and opinions singly Or cellectively,
through word of mouth; in writings through pictures 'or through other media.

No individual shall be coerced to disclose his thoughts and opinions.

V. Freedom of sience and the arts:

‘ARTICLE 21 - Every-individual is entitled to acquire and impart science and
arts. to practice, profess and to disseminate knowledge concerning them, and to
carry out all kinds of research in these fields.

Education and teaching shall ‘be free under the supervision and control of the
State.

The provisions governing private schools shall be regulated by laws in con-
formity with the level desired to be attained in state schools.-

No educational institutions shall be set up which are incompatible with the
principles of learning and education.

VI. Provisions governing the press and publications

a) Freedom of the press

ARTICLE 22 - The press is free, and shall not be subjected to censorship.
The State shall adopt the measures to assure the freedom of the press, and the
obtainment of information.

Freedom of the press and the obtainment of information can be restricted by
law only in order to safeguard national security, or public morality, to prevent
attacks on the dignity, honor and rights of individuals; to prevent instigations to
commit crimes; and to assure proper implementation of judicial functions.

Barring a court order passed in cases specified by law, in order that the judi-
cial functions may be carried out properly, no ban shall be imposed on publication.
of any item of information.

The confiscation of newspapers and periodicals published in Turkey can be
carried out only in conformity with a'court judgment, or in the event that offenses
http://www.newocr.com/




are committed for which the pertinent law enplicitly specifies that these measures
shall be applied.

The newspapers and periodicalsdpublish'ed in Turkey can. be closed down only
by court judgment, in the event of conviction for offenses provided in article 57.

b) The right to publish newspapers and periodicals

h ARTICLE 23 - Publication of newspapers and perIOdiCals shall nut be subject
to obtaining permission prior to publication nor to the depositing of a guarantee
fund.

The publication and distribution of newspapers and periodicals, their financial
resources, and the conditions pertaining to journalism shall be «regulated by law.
Such law shall lay down no political. economic, financial orntechnical restrictions
liable to curb or coerce the free dissemination of news, ideas'vand p‘piniQns.

Newspapers and periodicals shall avail themselves of the . media and facilities
provided by the State. and otherflpublic corporate bodies . or . associations affiliated
with them. and these facilities shall be equally available to all.

c) The right to publish books and pamphlets

ARTICLE 24 - No permits shall be necessary for the publication of books
and pamphlets. nor shall they be subject to censorship.

Books and pamphlets published in Turkey shall not be confiscated except in:
cases provided under paragraph 5 of article 22.

d) The protection of printing equipment

ARTICLE 25 - Printing shops. including their presses and other furniture
and fixtures shall not be seized, confiscated, or prevented from operation. even
though the underlying charge may be that they are accessory to a criminal act.

6) The right to make use of means of communication other than the press

ARTICLE 26 - Individuals and political parties are entitled to avail themsel-
ves of the communication and publication facilities including the press which are
owned by public corporate bodies The c’onditipns and procedures for such obligation
shall be regulated in conformity with democratic principles'and standards of equity.
No law.shall .be enacted which restricts freedom of information, or which aims to
controlthe formation of ideas and opinionskand’the shaping of public opinion.

1‘) The right to controvert and rebut : ' M V
ARTICLE 27 - The right to controvert and to rebut is recognized only in

cases where the dignity and honor of individuals have been affected, or where they
have been made the butt of unfounded statements in print.

If 91?: counter statement ”containing the individual's rebuttal is not published:
voluntarily. a court of justice shall ”decide fOr or against its publication}
http://www.newocr.com/




VII. The right and freedom to congregate
1 a) The right to congregate and march in demonstration
j ARTICLE 28 - All individuals are entitled to congregate or march in de-
l monstration without prior permission, insolong as they are unarmed and have no
intent to assault.
This right can be restricted only by law for purposes of maintaining public
order.

b) The right to form associations
5 ARTICLE 29 - Every individual is entitled to form associations without
f prior permission. This right can be restricted only by law for the purposes of
mam' tamln' ‘ g public order or morality.
VIII. Provisions governing the protection of rights

6) Personal security

ARTICLE 30 '.- Individuals against whom there exists a strong case for
indictment can be detained by court judgment for purposes of preventing escape or
alteration of evidence, or in other similar cases which necessitate detainment and in

other instances specified by law. The prolongation of detainment is subjest to the
same conditions.

Taking into custody is resorted to ,only. in flagrq‘nte delic‘to or _in__c_ases where
delay is likely to thwart justice. The conditions for such detainment shall be speci-
fied by law.

Individuals taken or held in custody shall be notified immediately in writing
of the reasons for their detention as, well as- of the charges against them.-

The person taken or held in custody shall be arraigned within 24 hours
excluding the time taken to send him to the court nearest to the place of arrest. and
after the lapse of this time, such person cannot be deprived of his freedom without
a court judgment. When 'a person ‘taken'or held in custody, or .is so arraigned, his
next of kin shall be immediately'notified thereof.

All damages suffered by persons subjected to treatment other "than that spe-
cified herein shall be indemnified by th'e'State according to law.
b) The freedom to seek one’s rights

ARTICLE 31 - Every individual is entitled to litigate and defend his case
as plaintiff or defendant before judicial authorities by availing lnm' self of all legiti-
mate methods and procedures.

No court of justice shall abstain from conducting the trial of a case within
its jurisdiction.

0) Ordinary channels of justice

ARTICLE 32 - No person, shall be made to appear before an agency other
than the relevant court.
http://www.newocr.com/




No agencies vested with extraordinary powers to pass judgment can be
created which may entail the appearance of a person before an agency other than
the court normally empowered to try him.

d) Punishments may be meted out only by reference to law and they concern
only the individual involved; prohibition of duress

ARTICLE 33 - No person shall be punishable for an act which is not consi-
dered an offense under the law in force at the time the act was committed.

Punishments and penal measures shall be established only by law.

No person shall be punishable with a heavier penalty than that provided in
the law for that offense at the time the offense was committed.

No person shall be coerced to make statements or to give testimony liable to
incriminate himself or his legally defined next of kin. Criminal responsibility is
personal.

No penalty involving general confiscation shall be imposed.

e) The right to prove the truth of an allegation

ARTICLE 34 - In cases of libel instituted by those in public service on the
grounds that libellous statements were made concerning the plaintiff's discharge of
his services or functions, the defendant is entitled to prove the truth of his allega-
tions. In cases falling outside of the above, the granting of the request to- prove the
truth of the libellous statement is dependent upon whether or not the determination
of the allegation is in public interest. or upon whether the plaintiff requests such a
hearing designed to establish the turth or falsity of the statement.

SECTION THREE
Social and economic rights and duties

1. Protection of the family

ARTICLE 35 - The family is the fundamental-unit-of the Turkish Society.

The State and other public corporate bodies shall adopt the requisite measu-
res and establish the organizations needed for the protection of the family, the
mother. and the child.

II. Property rights

ARTICLE 36 - Every individual in ’entitled to the rights of ownership am;
inheritance.

a) General rule concerning property

These rights may be restricted Only by law in the interest of the public.
The exercise of property rights shall in no way conflict ‘with public welfare.
http://www.newocr.com/



11

b) Land ownership

ARTICLE 37 - The State shall adopt the measures needed to achieve the
efficient utilization of land and to provide land for those farmers who either have
no land, or own insufficient land. For this purpose the law may define the size of
tracts of land according to different agricultural regions and types of soil. The
State shall assist farmers in the acquisition of agricultural implements.

e) Expropriation

ARTICLE 38 - The State and other corporate bodies, where public interest
deems it necessary, are authorized, subject to the principles and procedures as set
forth in the pertinent law, to expropriate the whole or a part of any immovable
prOperty under private ownership, or to impose an administrative servitude thereon
provided that the true equivalent value is immediately paid in cash.

The form of payment of the true equivalent values of land expropriated for
the purpose of enabling farmers to own land, for nationalization of forests, for
afforestation and for accomplishing the establishment of settlement projects, shall
be provided by law. Where the law deems it necessary that payment be made by
installments, the period of payment shall not exceed ten years. In this event, the
installment shall be paid in equal amounts and shall be subject to interest rates
prescribed by law.

The value of that part of expropriated land which is tilled by the farmer
himself, the amount of land to be indicated by law which is essential within equitable
principles, to provide him with a living, and the value of the land expropriated from
the small farmer shall be paid in cash under all circumstances.

d) Nationalization

ARTICLE 39- Where it is deemed necessary in the public interest, private
enterprises which bear the characteristics of a public service, may be nationalized
provided that the true equivalent value thereof is paid as indicated by law.‘ Where
the law deems it necessary that payment be made by installments, the period of
payment shall not exceed ten years, and the installments shall be paid in equal
amounts; these installments shall be subject to interest rates prescribed by law.

III. Freedom of work and contracts

ARTICLE 40 - Every individual is entitled to carry on business activities,
and to enter into contracts in the field of his choice. The establishment of private
enterprises is free.

The law may restrict these freedoms only in the public interest.

The ‘State shall adopt those measures necessary to ensure the functioning of
private enterpriSes in an‘ atmosphere of security and stability consistent with the
requirements of the national economy "and the objectives of the society.
http://www.newocr.com/



12 

IV. The regulation of economic and social life

ARTICLE 41 - Economic and social life shall be regulated in a manner
consistent with justice, and the principle of full employment, with the objective of
assuring for everyone a standard of living befitting human dignity.

It is the duty of the State to encourage economic, social and cultural deve-
lopment by democratic processes and for this purpose to enhance national savings.
to give priority to those investments which promote public welfare. and to draw
up development projects.

V. Provisions governing employment

a) The right and duty to engage in an occupation, trade or business

ARTICLE 42 - It is the right and duty of every individual to be engaged!
in some occupation, trade or business.

The state shall protect workers and promote employment by adopting social.
economic and financial measures of such nature that workers will be provided'
with a decent human existence so that stable employment may be developed.

The State shall also adopt measures to prevent unemployment. Imposing unwarranted
burdens on individuals without compensation is prohibited.
The forms and conditions of physical and intellectual work in [the nature of
civic duty in cases where the needs of the country so require shall be regulated by
law in accordance with democratic procedures.
b) Conditions of employment:
ARTICLE 43 - No individual can be employed at a job that does not suit
his age. capacity and sex.
Children. young people. and women shall be accorded special protection in
terms of conditions of employment.
6) The right to rest:
ARTICLE 44 ~ Every worker has the right to rest.
The right of paid week-ends. religious and national holidays. and paid annual
leave shall be regulated by law.
d) Provision of equity in wages:
ARTICLE 45 - The State shall adopt the necessary measures so that wor- I
kers may earn decent wages commensurate with the work they perform. and suf-
ficient to enable them to maintain a standard of living befitting human dignity.
e) The right to establish trade unions:
ARTICLE 46 - Employees and employers are entitled to establish trade
unions and federations of trade unlons without having to obtain prior permission. to
enrol in them as members. and to resign from such membership freely.
http://www.newocr.com/




13
For those engaged in public services other than physical labor similar rights
shall be regulated by law.

The by-laws, the management, and the operation of trade unions and federa-

i tions thereof shall not conflict with democratic'principles.
i 1’) The right to bargain collectively and to strike:

ARTICLE 47 - In their relations with their employers, workers are entitled
to bargain collectively and to strike with a view to protecting or improving their
economic and social status.

I The exercise of the right to strike, and the exceptions thereto, and the rights
of employers shall be regulated by law.

IV. Social security:

ARTICLE 43 - Every individual is entitled to social security. The State is
charged with the duty of establishing or assisting in the establishment of social
insurance and seeiai welfare organizations.

VII. The right to medical care:
i ARTICLE 49 - It is the responsibility of the State to ensure that everyone
J leads a healthy life both physically and mentally. and receives'medicai attention.
I The State shall take measures to provide the poor and low-income families
with dwellings that meet sanitary requirements.

VIII. Education:

i ARTICLE 50 - One of the foremost duties of the State is to provide for the

educational needs of the people.

Primary education is compulsory for all citizens, male and female, and shall

be provided free of charge in State Schools.

To assure that capable and deserving students in need of financial support

7 may attain the highest level of learning consistent with their abilities, the State
shall assist them through scholarships and other means.

The State shall take the necessary measures conducive to making useful citizens
of those who need special training on account of their physical and mental incapacity.

The State shall provide for the preservation of works and monuments of his-
torical and cultural value.

IX. Promotion of cooperative activities:

ARTICLE 51 - The State shall take measures conducive to the promotion
of cooperative activities.

X. Protection of Agriculture and farmers:

ARTICLE 52 - The State shall take the necessary measures to provide the

people with adequate nourishment, to assure an increase in agricultural production
http://www.newocr.com/



14
to the benefit of thesociety. to prevent erosion, to enhance the value of agricultural
products. and the toil of those engaged in agriculture.
XI. 'The scope of the economic and social duties of the State

ARTICLE 53 - The State shall carry out its duties to attain the social and
economic goals provided in this section only insofar as economic development and its
financial resources permit.

SECTION FOUR
Political rights and duties

I. Citizenship

ARTICLE 54 - Every individual who is bound to the Turkish State by ties of
citizenship is a Turk.

The child of a Turkish father or a Turkish mother is a Turk. The citizenship
status of a child of a. Turkish mother and a. foreign father shall be regulated by law.

Citizenship is acquired under the conditions provided by law, and is lost only
under conditions provided by law.

No Turk shall be deprived of his citizenship unless he commits an act irrecon-
cilabe. with loyalty to the homeland.

The right to litigate in cases of decisions and procedures involving deprivation
of citizenship shall not be obstructed.

II. The right to elect and be elected

ARTICLE 55 - All citizens'are entitled to elect and be elected, pursuant, to the
conditions provided in the law.

Elections shall be free, and secret and shall be conducted on the basis of
equality, direct suffrage, open counting and classification.

III. Provisions governing political parties

a) The right to found political parties and their place in political life

ARTICLE 56 - Citizens are entitled to establish political parties and to join
in or withdraw from them pursuant to pertinent rules and procedures.

Political parties can be founded without prior permission and shall operate
freely.

Whether in power or in opposition political parties are indispensable entities
of democratic political life.

b) Principles to which political parties are expected to conform:

ARTICLE 57 - The statutes, programs and activities of political parties shall
conform to the principles of a democratic and secular republic, based on human
http://www.newocr.com/



15
rights and liberties, and to the fundamental principle of the State‘s territorial and
national integrity. Parties failing to conform to these provisions‘shall be permanently
dissolved.

Political parties shall account for their sources of income and expenditures to
the Constitutional Court.

The internal affairs and activities of political parties, the manner in which
they shall be accountable to the Constitutional Court, and the manner in which this
Court shall audit their finances, shall be regulated by law in accordance with democ-
ratic principles.

Actions in law involving the dissolution of political parties shall be heard at
the Constitutional Court, and the verdict to dissolve them shall be rendered only by
this Court.

IV. The right to enter public service

3.) Entry into public service

ARTICLE 58 - Every Turk is entitled to enter public service.

In hiring personnel no discrimination shall be made other than job qualifications.

b) Declaration of financial net worth

ARTICLE 59 - The law shall prescribe the conditions of declaration of finan-
cial net worth for persons entering public service. Those assuming duties In the
legislative and executive organs shall not be exempt from this obligation.

V. The right and duty to take part in the defense of the homeland

ARTICLE 60 - Taking part in the defense or the homeland is. the right and
duty,of every Turk. This duty and the obligation to serve in thearmediorces shall
be. regulated by law. _ p

VI; Tax obligatioric

ARTICLE 61 - To meet public expenditures every individualist." under obligation
to pay taxes in proportion to his financial capacity. ., 3.15}

«Taxes, dues, charges and similar financial obligations shall be . imposed only.
by 13W.

VII. The right to petition : i

ARTICLE 62 - Citizens are entitled to petition in writing singly or collec-
tively the competent authorities, and the Grand National 'Assembly concernmg
requests and complaints involving themselves or thespublicm

The action taken as. a result of petitioning involving the applicants in person
shall be communicated to them in writing.
http://www.newocr.com/



15

9 _ . PART THREE

The basic organization of the republic
SECTION ONE

Legislative power

A) THE GRAND NATIONAL ASSEMBLY
I. Organization of the T. G. N. A.
ARTICLE 63 - The Grand National Assembly of Turkey is composed of the

National Assembly and the Senate of the Republic.

The two bodies meet in joint session in such instances as provided in the Cons-
titution.

II. The duties and powers of the T. G. N. A.

a) General provisions

ARTICLE 64 - The Grand National Assembly is empowered to enact, amend
and repeal laws, to debate and adopt the bills on the State budget and final accounts,
to pass resolutions in regard to minting currency, proclaiming pardons and amnesties,
and to the carrying out of definitive death sentences passed by courts.

17) Ratification of International Treaties

ARTICLE 65 - The ratification of treaties negotiated with foreign States and
international organizations in behalf of the Turkish Republic is dependent upon app-
roval of the-Turkish Grand National Assembly and such ratification can be finalized
only through the enactment of a law_by the Turkish Grand National Assembly.

Treaties which regulate economic, commercial and technical relations. and
which are not effective for a periOd longer than one year, may be put into' effect
through promulgation, provided they do not entail a commitment of the State’s
finances and provided they do not infringe upon the status of individuals or upon
the rights of ownership of Turkish citizens in foreign lands. In. such cases. these
[treaties must. be brought ,tothe- attention of the Turkish Grand National Assembly
within two months following their prgmulgation.

Agreements concluded in connection with the implementation of an inter-
national treaty, and economic, commercial, technical or administrative treat-lee concluded
pursuant to the authority provided by laws are not required to be approved by the
Turkish Grand National Assembly provided however that economic and commercial
treaties or treaties affecting the rights of individuals-shall not» be put into effect
unless promulgated.

The provisions of paragraph 1 shall apply in all treaties involving amendments
in Turkish legislation.
Internationaltreaties duly put into effect carry the force of law. No recourse
to the Constitutional Court can be made as provided in articles 149 and 151 With
regard to these treaties.
http://www.newocr.com/



 17
c) The authority to permit the use of armed forces

ARTICLE 66 - The authority to declare a state of war in cases deemed legi-
timate by international law, and exclusive of cases rendered necessary by international
treaties to which Turkey is a party, or by rules of international comity, to send
TurkiSh enpe‘ditionary forces to foreign lands and to allow foreign armed forces to
bé'étht‘icshéa' in Turkey, is vested in the Turkish Grand National Assembly.

Forthegranting of such permission the National Assembly and the Senate shall
pass, resolutions in .joint session.
in. The National Assembly

I' (1) Organization:

ARTICLE 67 - The National Assembly is composed of 450 deputies elected
by direct general ballot.

2)) ,EZect-ion qualifications for deputy

1 ’ ARTICLE 68 - Every Turk who has completed his thirtieth year. is eligible
to be elected deputy.

Persons who are illiterate, under interdiction. those who have not done or
those who are not considered to have done their active military service despite the
fact that they are liable for and not exempted from such service, those who are
barred; from public service, those who have been convicted by final judgment to a.
term of penal servitude or who have been sentenced to five years imprisonment.
exceptin -.oases ,of conviction for negligence, or those who have been sentenced by final
Judgment for any offense such as ‘defalcation, misappropriation, embezzlement,
bribery. theft, fraud, forgery, breach of confidence. and those Who have been convic-
ted of such disgraceful offense as fraudulent bankruptcy are net eligible for election
as deputies, even though they may have been pardoned.

I Placing one’s candidacy shall notbe made dependent upon resignation from

1 2131112110 . service.

1 To ensure that elections are conducted safely, provision shall be made in the

iawvas to which public servants may place their candidacy ,and under what conditions.

i Judges, army officers, military employees and non-commissioned officers are

i not entitled to place their candidacy or to be elected unless they resign from office.

1 c) The term of office of the National Assembly

i ‘ ' ARTICLE 69 - Elections to the National Assembly shall be held every four

1 years.

The Assembly may decide to hold new elections before the termination of the

four-year period. Deputies whose term of iffice expires shall be eligible for reelection
I,'lle,.powcr_of the National Assembly continues until, a new National Assembly
is elected.
http://www.newocr.com/



13

IV. The Senate of the Republic:

3.) Organization:

ARTICLE 70 - The Senate of the Republic is composed of 150 members
elected by general ballot, and 15 members appointed by the President of the Republic.

The Chairman and members of the National Unity Committee whose names
are listed under law 157 dated December 13. 1960, and the former Presidents of the
Republic are ex officio members of the Senate of the Republic regardless of their
age. The ex officio members are subject to the same provisions as the other membes
of the Senate of the Republic, provided, however that paragraphs I and 2 of Article
73. and paragraph 1 of temporary article 10 of Section V of this Constitution are not
applicable to these members. Ex officio members who join a political party subse-
ment to their joining the Senate shall lose their status as ex off-icio members on
the date of the first senatorial election held thereafter.

b) The right to elect members to the Senate

ARTICLE 71 - All Turks who are eligible to vote in the election of the
National Assembly shall be eligible to vote under the same conditions in the election
of the Senate.

c) Qualifications for Senate membership:

ARTICLE 72 - Every Turk who has completed his fortieth year. and received
a higher education. and who is eligible to be elected a deputy, may be elected tot-he
Senate of the Republic.

Members appointed by the President shall be selected from? among. people
distinguished for their services in various fields and shall have completed their
fortieth year. At least ten of such members shall be appointed from among persons
who are not members'of any politicalparty.

d) Term of office of Senate members

ARTICLE 73 - The term of office of Senate members is six years; Members
completing their term of'b’ffice are eligible fer re-election.‘

one third of ”the Senate‘meinbers elected by'generai'baIIOt and by the President
of the‘Pepublic shall be rotated every‘twosyears. . g A

When the'iterms of office of the membersappointed by the President, expire,
or when a vacancy occurs in these memberships for any other reason. the President
of the Republic shall appoint anew member within a month.
The person appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed for the remainder
of the term of office of the member he replaces.

V. Postponement of elections for the Grand National Assembly and By-eieo-
Hons:

ARTICLE 74 -‘ If new elections cannot‘be beld due to a state of war, they
may be postponed for one year by law.
http://www.newocr.com/




19

By-eleCtions to the both legislative bodies of Grand National Assembly shall

be. held ,’every-two,. years at the same time as the senatorial elections.

1.:191‘3.‘ I} 4‘.’ '.,1 .- 23" '.. J

tl‘fio,,by-elections shall be held one year prior to the general elections for the
Missal} .Ksssrhblyi

f LVLerrooedures governing the holding and supervision of elections

ARTICLE“ - Elections shall be conducted under the control and supervision
or 'j‘fi‘dic‘isi begins.

7 , _To implement and cause to implement all procedures necessary to the fair
‘aii‘aagaéay‘ conduct of elections from inception to completion, to review and pass
finaljudgment on all irregularities. complaints and objections regarding election
r‘iiatters‘jduring' and after elections. and to certify the validity of election credentials
‘rzi'nW “I...
are‘functions devolving upon the Supreme Election Board.

The functions and powers of the Supreme Election Board and other Election
Boards shall be regulated by law.

The Supreme Election Board shall be composed of seven regular members and
four alternates. Six of the members shall be elected by the general assembly of the
Court of Cessation, and five by the general assembly of the Council of State from
‘among‘their own members by secret ballot, and by an absolute majority of their
plenary session; These members in turn shall elect from among themselves by secret
ballot 'andT'by absolute majority. a chairman and a vice-chairman.

VThe four alternate members of the Supreme Election Board shall be selected
thy" lot. 'two frOm the members chosen by the Court of Cassation and two from the
members chosen from the Council of State. The Chairman and Vice-Chairman of the
Supreme Election Board are exempt from the drawing of lots.

B. ‘ Provisions Applicable to both Zagislative bodies

1. Provisions governing membership in the Grand National Assembly

a) Representation of the Nation

ARTICLE 76 - Members of the Grand National Assembly represent neither
their constituencies nor their constituents, but the nation as a whole.

‘0) Oath taking

ARTICLE 77 - The members of the Grand National Assembly of Turkey shall
take the following oath at their induction into office:

«I swear upon my honor that I will protect the independence of the State.
and the integrity of the homeland and the nation, that I will remain committed to
the unqualified and unconditional sovereignty of the nation, and to the principles
of a democratic and secu’ar republic. and that I will make every effort to promote
the happiness of the people.»
http://www.newocr.com/




20

c) Activities incompatible with memberstip

ARTICLE 78 - No person may become a member of both legislative bodies

Members of the Turkish Grand National Assembly may not be employed by
any governmental department or other public corporate bodies nor enterprises
and corporations in which the State or other corporate bodies participate directly
or indirectly. nor may they hold positions in the administrative boards and in other
public welfare societies of which the private sources of income and special facilities
are provided by law, and neither may they directly or indirectly undertake any of
their activities.

Members of the Turkish Grand National Assembly may not be charged with
any official or private responsibility which entails proposals. recommendations.
appointments. or approval by the Executive branch. A member may accept a tem-
porary assignment not exceeding six months on a specific subject only with the
approval of the particular legislative body to which he belongs.

Other occupations ant functions incompatible with membership in the Turkish
Grand National Assembly are set forth by law.

dl Legislative immunities

ARTICLE 79 - Members of the Turkish Grand National Assembly may not
be held legally liable for their votes and statements. for the ideas and opinions they
express in the Assembly nor for repeating and disclosing these outside the As-
sembly.

No member of the legislative body. who is alleged to have committed an
offense before or after his election to office may be taken into custody. questioned.
held in custody nor brought to trial without the decision of the legislative body to
which he belongs.

This provision does not apply to cases where the accused was apprehended in
flagrante delicto which entail heavy penalties; provided. however. that in such
instances the competent authority is under obligation to inform directly and forth-
with particular legislative body to which the member belongs.

The execution of a criminal sentence passed against a member of the legislative
body before or after his election. is suspended until his membership expires.
Prescription does not operate for the duration of his term of office.

Prosecution of an elected member of a legislative body is dependent upon the
suspension of his immunity by the legislative body to which he belongs.

Political party groups in the legislative bodies shall not hold debates and pass
resolutions in connection with legislative immunities.

e) Disfranchisement of a member

ARTICLE 80 - A member of the Turkish Grand National Assembly shall

be disfranchised in cases of final conviction rendered by a competent court for an
offense preventing his election as a member and in cases where he resigns. is
http://www.newocr.com/



21

interdicted. accepts a duty incompatible With his status as a member, or when the
legislatieetbpdyqte,{Whisk-.149belongs decides to disfranchise him for failure to attend
>the .fugo‘tion‘sagf_;the Assembly for a consecutive period of one month without taking
leave or without offering an acceptable reason for his absence.

f) 'T'Reguestjor removal of legismtiue immunities

31. if ARTICLE-781 - In the event that a member is deprived of legislative immu-
‘ftiitiesrorfisrdefinitely disfr'anchlsed from membership by the vote of the Assembly,
the'zmemberacOncerned or any member of the Turkish Grand National Assembly may
within’one week from the date of such decision. apply to the Constitutional Court
forangannulment of thedecision on the grounds that it conflicts with the Consti-
-;tution. as; with @139- ‘_ fey-laws of the National Assembly. The Constitutional Court
shall render; aodecisjlon on the request for the removal of legislative immunities
withlnnf-iftesn days!-

g)_;S:alaries.and travel allowances : A

ARTICLE 82 - The salaries and travel allowances of the members of the
Turkish Grand National Assembly shall be regulated by law. The monthly total of
the salary may not exceed the monthly salary of a government official in the
highesttpay bracket; .travel allowances may not exceed half of the salary.

Not ;more than a three-month total of the salaries and travel allowances
may be paid in advance.

Increases in .and additions to the salaries and travel allowances of members
of the - Turkish Grand National Assembly to be made in any manner whatsoever
shall takeeffect only after the general elections following such increases and
additions.

C II.w Provisions governing the functions of the Turkish Grand National
Assembly.

a) Convocation and adjournment

ARTICLE 83 - The Turkish Grand National Assembly shall convene on the
first day Of November each year without summons.

Each year the Turkish Grand National Assembly may take vacations not
exceeding five months. Both legislative bodies shall take these vacations at the same
time.

During recess or vacation the Turkish Grand National Assembly shall be
convened either directly by the President of the Republic or upon the request of the
Council of Ministers. The chairman of each legis‘ative body shall. either directly
or upon the request of one fifth of its membership. convene his respective legislative
body.

7-When‘ one legislative body is convened. the other convenes without summons.

Legislative bodies convened while in recess or on vacation, shall first debate
the wherefore of the meeting.
http://www.newocr.com/




22

b) Chairmanship council

ARTICLE 84 - The chairmanship council of each legislative body shall be
so composed as to give proportionate representation to each political party rep-
resented ln that particular legislative‘body.

The chairmen of the National Assembly and of the Senate of the Republic
shall be elected by a two thirds majority of the plenary session of their zes-
pective legislative bodies, and by secret ballot for a term of two years. If this
specified majority cannot be obtained in the first two ballotings. an absolute majority
shall suffice. Political party groups represented in the legislative bodies may not
nominate candidates for the chairmanship thereof.

The Chairman and vice-chairman may not participate inside or Outside the
Turkish Grand National Assembly in the activities of the political parties or poli~
tical party groups to which they belong, neither can they take part in the debates
of the Assembly except in cases required by their founctions. The Chairman may
not vote.

In joint sessions of the Turkish Grand National Assembly the Chairmanship
council of the National Assembly shall preside.

c) By-laws, political party groups and disciplinary measures

ARTICLE 85 - The functions of the Turkish Grand National Assembly and
those of each legislative body shall be governed by the provisions of their own
by-laws.

The provisions of the by-laws shall be so conceived as to assure to! each
political party group participation in all the activities of both legislative bodies in
proportion to their size. A political party group shall consist of at least ten mem-
bers.

The legislative bodies shall enact their own disciplinary rules and enforce
them.

(i) Quorums for meetings and resolutions

ARTICLE 86 - An absolute majority of its plenary session, shall constitute
a meeting quorum for each legislative body. and unless otherwise provided in the
Constitution, an absolute majority of the attending members shall constitute a
quorum of decision.

The quorum for the Turkish Grand National Assembly shall be the absolute
majority of the plenary session of both legislative bodies.

c) Debates are public and published

ARTICLE 87 - Debates in both legislative bodies are public and published
in extenso in the record of proceedings of the legislative body concerned.

Subject to the provisions of their respective rules of procedure, each legislative
body may hold closed sessions; the publication of the debates of such sessions is
subject to the decision of the legislative body concerned.
http://www.newocr.com/


23
The publication by every means of public proceedings in legislative bodies
shall in no way be prevented.
III; .Methods of Supervision of the Turkish Grand National Assembly
“‘.a)"§Géfierdllg}
ARTICLE 88 - Questions. General debates, parliamentary investigations
and." parliamentary inquiries fall under the jurisdiction of both legislative bodies.
Parliamentary inquiries are investigations conducted with a view to obtaining
information on a specific subject.
g b) g Int-emanation:
ARTICLE 89 - The power of interpellation is vested exclusively in the
National; Assembly.
The (question whether or not a motion of interpellation made by deputies, or
‘by apolitical party g‘roup,‘ is to be placed on the agenda, shall be bedated at the
first session following the submittal of the motion. At such debates, only the member
0173099 of .the members of the group who made the motion. or a deputy acting on
behalf of each: political party group, or either the Prime Minister or a Minister acting
on behalf of the Council of Ministers may take the floor.
The; day on which the interpellation is to be debated shall be decided at the
same;time.as the decision to place the interpellation on the agenda is announced.
The: interpellation may not be debated before the lapse of two days following
the date of the decision to place the interpellation on the agenda. and may not be
delayed for more than seven days.
1 ‘Mbtion of no confidence accompanied by a statement of the reasons therefor
during'the debate of an interpellation. or the request for a vote of confidence on the
part of the Council of Ministers shall be put to vote only after the lapse of one full
day.
V‘TAn absolute majority of the plenary Session; has the power to unseat the
Council of Ministers from office.
i J c) 'Pa-rliamentary investigation:
2 ARTICLE 90 - Requests for parliamentary investigation concerning the
Prime Minister or other Ministers shall be debated and voted upon at the plenary
sessionof the Turkish Grand National Assembly.
The investigation shall be carried &out by a committee composed of an equal
inumber of members from each legislative body.
7 ' ‘The resolution to refer the matter to the Supreme Court 'shall be voted on at a
plenary session.
f No debates may be conducted and no resolutions may be adopted at political
party caucuses in either legislative body in ’regard to parliamentary investigation.
http://www.newocr.com/



24
C) ENACTMENT OF LAWS
I. General Principles

a) The right to initiate legislation:

ARTICLE 91 - The Council of Ministers and the members of the Turkish
Grand National Assembly are entitled to initiate legislation.

The members may defend the proposed legzslation at the relevant committees
of path legislative bodies.

1)) The debate and enactment of laws:

ARTICLE 92 - Bills and proposals shall be debated first in the National
Assembly.

Bills and proposals adopted with or without modification. or rejected outright
by the National Assembly shall be referred to the Senate of the Republic.

If the draft adopted by the National Assembly is endorsed by the Senate of
the Republic without-modification, such draft becomes law.

If the Senate of the Republic endorses with amendments the draft submitted
to it. such draft becomes law, provided the National Assembly approves the modifi-
cations made by the Senate.

In case the NatiOnal Assembly refuses to accept the amended draft referred
by'the Senate of the Republic, 8. mixed committee shall he set up composed of an
equal number of members from among the relevant committees of both legislative
bodies.

The draft prepared by this committee shall be submitted to the National
Assembly which is under obligation to adopt without change either the draft of the
mixed committee or that of the Senate of the Republic or the one previously prepared
by itself.

When the proposed amendment to articles is adopted by a vote of absolute
majority of the plenary session ofthe Senate of the Republic, the National Assembly
may adopt its own original and unamended draft only by a vote of an absolute
majority of its plenary session. In such Instances the voting shall be by open ballot.

If a bill or proposal rejected by the National Assembly is also rejected by the
Senate of the Republic, it is void.

If a bill or a prbposal rejected by the National Assembly is adepted by the
Senate of the Republic either with or without amendments, the National Assembly
shall review the draft approved by the Senate of the Republic. If the draft of the
Senate of the Republic is adopted by the National Assembly it becomes law; if it is
rejected the draft or proposal becomes void. If the draftsent by the Senate of the
Republic is approved with amendments, the provisions of paragraphs 5 shall apply.

An absolute majority vote of a plenary session of the National Assembly is
required in order to .approve a draft 'rejected in toto by an absolute majority of a
plenary session of the Senate. In such cases the voting shall be by open ballot.
http://www.newocr.com/


25

If a draft of legiSlation is rejected in toto by a two thirds majority vote of a
plenary session of the Senate, it can b'éco’eh‘e law only if it is approved by a two
thirds majority vote of a plenary session of the National Assembly. In such cases-
the voting shall be by open ballot.

The Senate of the Republic shall vote on a draft referred to it, within a period
not exceeding the length of time devoted to debate on that draft both in the com-
mittees and in the plenary session of the National Assembly. Such period may not
exceed three months, and in cases of emergency it may not be less than fifteen days,
and in normal times it may not be less than one month. Drafts not voted on within
such periods shall be considered as approved by the Senate in the form they arrived
from the National Assembly. When the legislative bodies are on vacation, such time
shall not be included in the periods specified in this paragraph.

The provisions of the foregoing paragraphs shall apply to the passage or
rejection of legislation concerning the election of the legislative and local adminis-
trative bodies and in the approval or rejection of drafts and proposals concerning the
political» parties. provided however, that in cases calling for the establishment of a.
mixed committee, the report of this committee shall be debated and resolved upon
at a plenary session of the Turkish Grand National Assembly. For the adoption of
the initial draft of the National Assembly at the session of the Grand National
Assembly, the absolute majority of the plenary session is required; the provisions
of paragraphs 8 and 9 are reserved.

c) Promulgation of legislation by the President of the Republic

ARTICLE 93 - The President of the Republic shall promulgate the laws
enacted by the Turkish Grand National Assembly within ten days. Any law he
disapproves he shall return to the Grand National Assembly for reconsideration to-
gether with his reasons within the same period. The budget laws and the Constitution
do not fall within the scope of this provision. Should the Turkish Grand National
Assembly re-enact the law so returned, the President of the Republic shall promul-
gate said law Within ten days from re-enactment.

II. Debate and adoption of the budget: proposals wish would result in in-
creases in State expenditures and decreases in State income

ARTICLE 94 - The report incorporating the bills relating to the general and
annexed budgets, and the national budget estimates shall be submitted to the Turkish
Grand National Assembly by the Council of Ministers at least three months before
the beginning of the new fiscal year.

These budget bills and budget estimates reports shall be entrusted to a mixed
committee to consist of thirty five deputies and fifteen Senate members. In forming
this committee at least thirty of the fifty seats shall be assigned to members of the
party or parties in power, and the remaining seats shall be distributed proportiona-
tely among the other political parties and independents.

The budgetary drafts submitted to the mixed committee shall be acted upon
within a period not exceeding eight weeks, and the text thus approved by the mixed
http://www.newocr.com/


26
committee shall then be debated by the Senate of ,the Republic, and voted, upon
within a. length of time not exceeding ten days.
1 ' Thereafter the' draft approved by the Senate of the Republic shall be referred
back to the mixed committee for its reconsideration which must be completed within
one week. The final draft approved by the mixed committee shall be debated by the
National Assembly and voted. upon before the beginning of the fiscal year.

Members of the Grand National Assembly shall express their views on the
budgets of the Ministries. the budgets of the various government departments, and
the. annexed budgets. at the time each of these budgets is being debated in its enti-
rety‘at the plenary sessions of their respective legislative'bodies. The Sections of the
various budgets, and motions for amendment shall be read and put to vote without
being debated.

Members of the Turkish Grand National Assembly shall make no motions
entailing increases in expenditure or decreases in specific incomes at ‘the budget
debates conducted in plenary sessions.

3 E C T I O N '1‘ W 0
Executive Power
A) THE PRESIDENT OF THE REPUBLIC

I. Election and freedom from bias

ARTiCLE 95 - The President of the Turkish Republic shall be elected for
a term of seven years from among those members of the Turkish Grand National
Assembly who have completed their fortieth year and received higher education:
election shall be by secret ballot. and by a two thirds majority of the plenary ses-
sion. In case this majority is not obtained in the first two ballots, an absolute ma-
jority shall suffice.

The President is not eligible for re-election.

The President elect shall dissociate himself from his party, and his status as
a regular member of the Grand National Assembly shall be terminated.

II. Oath taking

ARTICLE 96 - The President of the Republic shall take the following oath
at his induction

«As President of the Republic, I swear upon my honor that I will fight any
threat directed against the independence of the Turkish State or against the integ-
rity of the fatherland and the Nation. that I will respect and defend the unqualified
and unconditional sovereignty of the Nation, that I will not deviate from the prin-
clples of a democratic state based on the rule of law and human rights, that I will
be free from all bias, and that I will do my utmost to protect and exalt the glory
of the Turkish Republic and fulfil the task I have undertaken.»
http://www.newocr.com/


27

III. Duties and authority

ARTICLE 97 - The President of the Republic is the head of the State. In
this capacity he shall represent the Turkish Republic and the integrity of the Tur-
kish Nation.

The President of the Republic shall preside over the Council of Ministers
whenever he deems it necessary, shall dispatch representatives of the Turkish State
to foreign states. shall receive the representatives of foreign states, shall ratify and
promulgate international conventions and treaties and may commute or pardon on
grounds of chronic illness, infirmity or old age the sentences of convicted individuals.

IV. Presidential immunities

ARTICLE 98 - The president of the Republic shall not be accountable for his
actions connected with his duties.

All decrees emanating from the President of the Republic shall be signed by
the Prime Minister, and the relevant Ministers. The Prime Minister and the Minister
concerned shall be responsible for the enforcement of these decrees.

V. Presidential responsibility

ARTICLE 99 - The President of the Republic may be impeached for high
treason upon the proposal of one third of the plenary session of the Turkish Grand
National Assembly, and conviction of high treason shall require the vote of at least
a two thirds majority of the joint plenary session of both legislative bodies.

VI. Deputation for the President of the Republic

ARTICLE 100 - In the event the President of the Republic is temporarily
absent on account of illness, or foreign travel, the chairman of the Senate of the
Republic shall act as deputy until the President returns to his post; and in the event
of the demise or resignation of the President or in the event of a vacancy for any
other reason. the chairman of the Senate of the Republic shall act as deputy until a.
new President of the Republic is elected.

VII. Termination of the President’s duties and election of a new President

ARTICLE 101 - The Turkish Grand National Assembly shall elect the new
President of the Republic 15 days prior to the expiration of the term of office of
the outgoing president; in the event of an emergency vacancy a new President will
be elected immediately.

B) THE COUNCIL OF MINISTERS

I. Organization:

ARTICLE 102 -‘ The Council of ministers shall consist of the Prime Minister
and the ministers.
http://www.newocr.com/


28

The Prime Minister shall be designated by the President of the Republic from
among the members of the Turkish Grand national Assembly.

The Ministers shall be nominated by the Prime Minister. and appointed by the
President of the Republic from among the members of the Turkish Grand National
Assembly, or from among those qualified for election as deputies.

II. Induction into office and vote of confidence

a) Vote of confidence at the time of induction

ARTICLE 103 - The full list of members of the Council of Ministers shall
be submitted to each legislative body. If these bodies are not in session. they shall
be convened.

The Prime Minister or any of the Ministers shall read the government prog-
ram before each legislative body not later than a week after the formation of the
Council of Ministers, whereupon the program shall be submitted to the National
Assembly for a vote of confidence. Debate on the vote of confidence shall begin
after two full days following the reading of the program. and the vote shall be
taken after one full day following the termination of the debates.

b) Vote of confidence while in office

ARTICLE 104 - If the Prime Minister deems it necessary, he may ask for
a vote of confidence from the National Assembly after discussing the matter at a
meeting of the Council of Ministers.

The request for a vote of confidence shall not be debated until after one full
day has elapsed from the time it was submitted to the National Assembly. and shall
be put to vote only one full day after the debate.

A request for a vote of confidence may be rejected only by an absolute majo-
rity of the plenary session.

III. Duties and political responsibility

ARTICLE 105 - As head of the Council of Ministers. the Prime anister
promotes cooperation among the Ministries. and supervises the implementation of
the goverment's general policy. The members of the Council of Ministers are jointly
and equally responsible for the manner in which this policy is implemented.

Each Minister shall be further responsible for the operations in his field of
authority and for the acts and activities of his subordinates.

The Ministers are subject to the same immunities and liabilities as the mem-
bers of the Turkish Grand National Assembly.

IV. Organization of the Ministries, and Ministers

ARTICLE 106' - The Ministries shall be organized in accordance with the
principles prescribed by law.
http://www.newocr.com/



29

A Minister shall become the acting Minister for a Ministry in which there
is a vacancy or for a Minister who is on leave or is absent for some valid reason.
In no case, however, may a Minister act for more than one Minister. A Minister
who is brought to trial before the Supreme Court by decision of the Turkish Grand
National Assembly shall be deprived of his ministerial status.

When a ministerial post is vacated for any reason whatsoever a new appoint-
ment shall be made within a length of time not exceeding fifteen days.

V. Regulations

ARTICLE 107 - The Council of Ministers may draw up regulations governing the
mode of enforcement of laws. provided that these are not in conflict with existing
legislation and have been considered by the Council of State.

Regulations shall be signed by the President of the Republic, and promulgated
in the same manner as laws.

VI. Renewal of the elections for the National Assembly by the President of
the Republic

ARTICLE 108 - If the Council of Ministers has been unseated twice by a
vote of no confidence according to articles 89 and 104 of the Constitution. within
a period of eighteen months. and if thereafter a third vote of no confidence is voted.
the Prime Minister may request the President of the Republic to call new e‘ections
for the National Assembly. Whereupon. the President of the Republic. after con-
sultation with the Chairmen of the legislative bodies. may decide to call new elec-
tions. Such decision shall be promu‘gated in the Official Gazette and immediately
thereafter steps shall be taken to hold new elections.

VII. Provisional Council of Ministers during elections

ARTICLE 109 - The Ministers of Justice, of Interior. and of Conununicatz'ons
shall resign prior to the elections for the National Assembly.

In the event of a decision being taken to call new elections before the regular
expiration of the legislative session. new Ministers of Justice, Interior, and Com-
munications shall be appointed by the Prime Minister from among the independent
members of the Turkish Grand National Assembly within five days after the date of
such decision, and not less than three days before the date on which elections are to
be held.

Upon the decision being reached to hold new elections in accordance with
Article 108, the Ministers shall resign and the Prime Minister shall from a Provisional
Council of Ministers.

The Provisional. Council of Ministers shall consist of members of the party
groups in proportion to their representation in the National Assembly. provided that
the Ministers of Justice, Interior and Communications are from among the inde-
pendent deputies in the Turkish Grand National Assembly.
http://www.newocr.com/



30

The number of members to be recruited from party groups shall be established
by the Chairman of the National Assembly and submitted to the Prime Minister.

Those party members who refuse to accept the ministerial posts offered or
who resign subsequently shall be replaced by independents in the National Assembly

or outside it.

The Provisional Council of Ministers shall be formed within five days following
the publication in the Official Gazette of the decision to hold new elections. The
Provisional Council of Ministers shall not be subject to a vote of confidence.

The provisional Council of Ministers shall discharge its functions for the
duration of the elections and until the new Assembly convenes.

VIII. National Defense:

a) The office of the Com'mander-in-Chief and the Chief of the General Staff:

ARTICLE 110 - The office of the Commander-in-Chief is integrated in spirit
in the Turkish Grand National Assembly and is represented by the President of the
Republic.

The Council of Ministers shall be responsible to the Turkish Grand National
Assembly for ensuring national security and preparing the armed forces for war.

The Chief of the General Staff is the Commander of the armed forces.

The Chief of the General Staff shall be appointed by the President of the
Republic upon his nomination by the Council of Ministers, and his duties and powers
shall be regulated by law. The Chief of the General Staff is responsible to the Prime
Minister in the exercise of his duties and powers.

1)) The National Security Council:

ARTICLE 111 - The National Security Council shall consist of the Ministers
as provided by law, the Chief of the General Staff, and representatives of the armed
forces.

The President of the Republic shall preside over the National Security Council,
and in his absence this function shall be discharged by the Prime Minister.

The National Security Council shall communicate the requisite fundamental
recommendations to the Council of Ministers with the purpose of assisting in the
making of decisions related to national security and coordination.

C) ADMINISTRATION

1. Fundamentals of Administration

a) The indivisibility and public corporate nature of the administration

ARTICLE 112 - The organization and functions of the administration are
based both on the principles of centralization and decentralization.
http://www.newocr.com/



31

In terms of organization and functions, the administration is a whole, and is
regulated by law.

Public corporate bodies shall be created only by law or on theauthority expressly
granted by law.

b) By-laws:., ' . . ‘ . l.: A

ARTICLE 113 - The Ministries and public corporate, bodies ,may issue
by-laws with the purpose of assuring the enforcement of the laws and regulations
related to their particular‘flelds of operation, and in conformity with such laws and
regulations. By-iaws shall be published in the OfficialGazette.

c) Judicial review:

ARTICLE 114 - No act or procedure of the administration shall be immune
from the review of- law enforcing courts.

In court actions instituted as a result of administrative acts, prescription shall
start as of the date of written notification. ' ‘ _ 1

The administration, is liable for the damages resulting from its acts and
Operations.

II. Administrative organiser-1'02:
t a) Central administration

ARTICLE 115 - In terms'of central adminiStrative organization, Turkey is
divided into provinces based on geographical and economic factors and on the re-
quirements of public service, and provinces are further divided into smaller adminis-
trative districts.

Provincial administration is based on the principle of self government.

Regional self governing organizations comprising several provinces may be
established with the purpose of carrying out specific public services.

b) Local administration

ARTICLE 116 - Local administrative bodies are public corporate entities
created to meet the common local needs of the citizens of provinces, municipal
districts, villages, whose policy-making organs are elected by the people.

The elections of local administrative bodies shall be held at such times as
prescribed by law and subject to the provisions of article 55 of this Constitution.

Jurisdiction concerning the acquisition or loss of the status of an administra-
tive organ shall be exercised only by courts.

The organization, and incorporation of local administrative bodies into unions,
their functions, powers, financial and disciplinary matters and their mutual ties
and relationships with the central administration shall be regulated by law. Sources
of income for these administrative bodies shall be provided proportionate to their
functions.
http://www.newocr.com/



32

IfI. firobisim’ts‘ governing Civil Service:

a') Gene’fdt miles

ARTICLE 117 - The basic and continuing activities of the public services
that the State and other public corporate bodies are expected to provide, in
accordance with principles of general administration, shall be carried out
by governinent officials.

The Qualifications of govémment officials, the procedures governing their
appointinent, their duties and powers, their rights and responsibilities, their salaries
and allowances and other matters of personnel shall be regulated by law.

b) Safeguards of government officials

ARTICLE 118 - In cases of disciplinary action initiated against government
officials, or against members of the staffs of professional organisations having the
status of a public inStitution, it is an indispensable condition that the allegation be
communicated to the defendant openly and in writing, and that he be requested to
submit a written defense and accOrd‘ed a definite period Of time to prepare and
present such defense.

No disciplinary action can be taken unless the above procedures are observed.

Disciplinary action shall not be left outside the jurisdiction of courts of justice.

The provisions applicable to 1mm 'tary personnel are reserved.

c) Provisions prohibiting government officials from joining political parties:

ARTICLE 119 - Government officials and staff members employed in an admi-
nistrative or supervisory capacityin public economic enterprises, and those who are
employed in the central offices of public welfare institutions, whose private facilities and
sources of income are provided by law, may not join political parties. Government
officials and those employed in public economic enterprises may make in the perfor-
mance of their official duties no discrimination whatsoever among citizens on account
of their political views.

Those whose violation of the above principles is established by court judge-
ment shall be permanently dismissed from public service.

IV. Autonomous establishments

a) The Universities

ARTICLE 120 - Universities shall be established only by State and by legis-
lation. The Universities are public corporate bodies enjoying academic and adminis-
trative autonomy.

Universities shall be administered and supervised by _ organs. consisting of
qualified members of the teaching staff elected from among themselves. The provi}
sions governing State Universities established by special laws are reserved."
http://www.newocr.com/



33
The organs. members of the teaching staff and'their sasistants may net, for'
any red‘sfgn WhatsoeVer, b‘e removed from their office by authorities other than the
universities. ‘- ' . I
-Memb'ers o'f the teaChing Staffs of universities and their assistants may freely
engage- in rehearch and publication activities. , g _ _ V
The Establishment and functioning of the universities, their organs and the
election held to from such organs, the functions and poWers thereof, and the super-
vision of teaching and research activities by the university organs, shall be regulated
by law pursuant to the abdve principles. ' _ . . i
The prohibition to join political parties’shall not be applicable to the members
of the teaching staff of universities and their assistants. HoweVer, such members of
the teaching staff and their assistants may not assume executive functions outside
the central organizations of. political parties.
b} Broadcasting and television. adm'iniStrhflOit and news agencies
ARTICLE 121 - The administration cf broadcasting and television stations
shall be regulated by law as autonomous public corporate bodies.
All radio and television broadcasts shall be made along the principles of im-
partiality.’
The broadcasting and television administration shall be vested with such
authority as is required for the performance of its function of furthering and pro-
mot’ing educational and cultural activities.
A'basic requisite for news agencies established or subsidized by the State is
to exercise impartiality.
V. Professional Organisations having the nature of public institutions:
ARTICLE 122 - Professional organizations having . the nature of public
inatitutions shall be created by law and their organs shall be elected by them and
from among their own members.
i The administration may not remove permanently or temporarily without a
court judgment, the elected organs from office.
The by-laws
http://www.newocr.com/



34
b.) Martial Law

ARTICLE 124 ~.-'- In the event of war, or of a situation likely to lead to war
or in case of arevoltorthe emergence of definite indications of a serious and active
uprising against the homeland. and the Republic, the -Council of Ministers may proc-
laim martial law in one or more than. one region of the country, or in every part
thereof, for a length of time not exceeding one month, and shall immediately submit
such proclamation to the approval of the Turkish Grand National Assembly.

The Assembly, when it deems necesSary, may curtail the period of the martial
law or abolish it altogether. If the legislative bodies are not in session, they shall
be convened immediately.

The extension of martial law, not exceeding two months each time is subject
to the decision of the Turkish Grand National Assembly. Such decisions shall be
taken at the joint session of both legislative bodies.

f. In the event of martial law, or war in general, the specific provisions to be
enforced, the manner in which government operations shall be conducted and the
manner in'which freedoms shall be restricted shall be defined by law.

VII. Illegal Orders

ARTICLE 125 - Persons employed in public services in any capacity or
manner whatsoever shall not carry out an order of a superior if the person receiving
the order considers it contrary to the provisions of by-laws, regulations, laws or the
Constitution, and shall inform the person issuing the order of this. contradiction.
However, should the superior insist on the performance of his order and reiterate
it in writing, such order shall be carried out. In this case the official enforting the
order shall not be held liable.

-An order, which by its very nature, constitutes a crime shall not be enforced
in any manner whatsoever; any person carrying out such an order shall not be
absolved from responsibility.

The carrying out of military duties. and the exceptions provided by law for
the preservation of public order and security in cases of emergency are reserved.

D) ECONOMIC AND FISCAL PROVISIONS

l. The Budget

ARTICLE 126 - The expenditures of the State and of public corporate
bodies, other than public economic enterprises, shall be effected in accordance with
the provisions of the annual budgets.

The law may prescribe special periods and procedures in connection with
investments related to development plans, or for work and services likely to last
more than one year.

The manner in wich the general and annexed budgets are to be drawn up
and applied shall be deflnedby law.
http://www.newocr.com/


35 - v

No provisions other than those pertaining to the budget shall -be incorporated
in the budget law.

11. Court of Accounts; auditing of public economic enterprises

ARTICLE 127 -‘- The Court of Accounts is in charge of auditing in behalf
of the Turkish Grand National Asssembly ‘ all accounts of revenue and expenditure
and property of government departments financed from general and annexed budgets,
and is in charge of reaching 'a definite decision concerning the accounts and opera-
tions of those responsible; and in general is in charge of examining, auditing and
deciding matters prescribed by legislation.

The organization of the Court of Accounts, its operation, auditing procedures.
the qualifications of its staff members, their appointment, their duties and powers,
their rights and obligations and other personnel matters, as well as the tenure of
its Chairman and members shall be regulated by law. , ‘ . a:

The auditing of the accounts of public economic enterprises by the Turkish
Grand National Assembly shall be regulated by law. ' - ~ I

III. Final auditing:

ARTICLE 128 - The drafts of final audit reports shall be submitted to the
Turkish Grand National Assembly not later than one year starting from the end
of the relevant fiscal year, provided that no shorter term is specified by law. The
Court of Accounts shall submit its general audits to the Turkish 6er National
Assembly within six nonths at the latest, beginning from the submittal of the final.
audit report.

IV. Development

a), Development projects and the State Planning Organization

ARTICLE 129 -. Economic, social and cultural development is based on a
plan. Development is carried out according to this plan.

The organization and functions of the State. Planning Organization, the prin?

~ciples to be observed in the preparation and execution, and application and revision
-of the plan, and the measures designed to prevent changes tending to impair the
unity of the plan, shall be regulated byspecial legislation.

b) The exploration and exploitation of natural resources : r

ARTICLE 130 - Natural wealth and resources shall be under the jurisdiction
and at the disposal of the State. The right to explore and exploit these resources
belongs to the State. Carrying out eploration and exploitation activities by' the
State in conjunction with private enterprise, or directly by private enterprise is
dependent on the explicit permission of the law.
http://www.newocr.com/



36

c) The consternation and decezepment of forests

ARTICLE 131 - The State shall enact requisite legislation and shall. adopt
the necessary measures for the conservation and expansion of forested areas. All J
forest? shall be under State supervision.

State forests shall be administered and exploited by the State ac‘cording‘to-
law. Theownership, administration and exploitation of State forests may not be
turned over to private persons. Such forests may not .be acquired through prescription-
and may not be made subject to administrative servitude, unless in the public interest.
No activity likely to harm foreSts shall be allowed.

The resettlement of the population living in or in the inimediat'e vicinity of
forests shall be regulated by law if such resettlement is deemed necessary to improve
the living conditions, of such population, and conserve the forests.

Forested areas destroyed by fire shall be reforested, and no farming or stock
breeding shall be allowed in such areas.

No amnesty shall be granted for offenses involving forests; and no political
propaganda likely to lead to the destruction of forests shall be permitted.

SECTION THREE
The Judiciary
A ) GENERAL PROVISIONS

l. Independerwe of courts:

ARTICLE 132 - Judges shall be independent in the discharge of their duties-
They shall pass judgment in accordance with the Constitution, law, justice and
their personal convictions.

No organ, office, agency or individual may give orders or instructions to courts.
or judges in connection with the discharge of their judicial duty, send them circulars,
or make recommendations or suggestions.

No questions may be raised, debates held, or statements issued in legislative
bodies in connection with the discharge of judicial power concerning a case on trial.
Legislative, executive organs, and the administration are under obligation to complyr
with ruling of the courts. Such organs and the administration shall in no manner-
whatsoever alter court rulings or delay their execution.

II. Tenure of judges:

ARTICLE 133 - Judges may not be dismissed. Unless they so desire, they
may not be retired before the age limit provided in the Constitution; they may not
be deprived of their salaries even for reason of the abolishment of a court or of a
staff position therein.

The exceptions prescribed by law concerning those convicted for a crime en-
tailing dismissal from office. those whose incapacity to‘ discharge duty for reasons-
http://www.newocr.com/



37
of. ill-health is definitely established, and those pronounced unsuitable to remain in
the profession, are reserved.

III. Provisions concerning juicigeshz'p:

ARTICLE 134 - The qualifications of judges, their appointment, rights and
duties, salaries and allowances, their promotion, the. temporary or permanent change

-of their duties or places of duty, the initiation of disciplinary proceedings. and the
subsequent disciplinary actions taken against them, for offenses arising from the
discharge of their functions; decision to question and try them for offenses connected
with the discharge'of their functions, conviction for crimes necessitating dismissal
from profession on instances of incompetence and other personnel'matters are regu-
lated by law in accordance with the principle of independence of courts.

Judges shall remain in‘office until they complete their sixty-fifth year. The
age limit for military judges is prescribed by law.

‘Judges may undertake noprivate or public duties other than those prescribed
by law.

IV. Court proceedings open to all and verdict justification:

ARTICLE 135 - Court proceedings shall be open to all. The conduct of all
or 'of a part of the proceedings in secret may be decided only in caries definitely
required by public morality or pubic security.

Special provision shall be made for the trial of minors.

Ali court verdicts shall be put down in writing and shall be accompanied by
the justification of the verdict.

V. Organization of courts

ARTICLE 136 - The organization of courts, their functions and jurisdiction,
operations and trial procedures shall be regulated by law.

VI. Public prosecutor

ARTICLE 137' - The law shall make provision for the tenure of public prose-
cutors and attorneys of the Council of State and their functions.

The Chief Prosecutor of the Republic, the Chief Attorney of the Council of
State and the Chief Prosecutor of the Military Court of Cessation are subject to
the provisions applicable to judges of higher courts.

VII. Military trial

ARTICLE 138 - Military trials are conducted by military and disciplinary
courts. These courts are entitled to try the military offenses of military personnel

and those offenses committed against military personnel or in .mllitary areas, or
offenses connected with military serviceand duties.

Military courts may try. non-military persons only for military offenses pres-
cribed by special laws.
http://www.newocr.com/



38
2 : T..The specific offenses and persons over which military courts shall have ju-
risdiction in time of war, or during a period of martial law, are prescribed by law.

It is imperative that the majority of members of military courts should?
possess the qualifications of judgeship.

The organization of military judicial organs, their operations, personnel mat-
ters pertaining to military judges, the independence of Courts and judicial tenure-
shall be regulated by special law in accordance with the requirements of military
service.

B). HIGHER COURTS

I. The Court of Cessation

ARTICLE 139 - The Court of Cassation is the court of the last instance for
reviewing the decisions and verdicts rendered by courts of law. It has original and
final jurisdiction in specific cases defined by law.

The members of the Court of Cassation shall be elected by the Supreme Coun-
oil of Judges. The: Chairman and Vice-Chairman of the Court of . Cassation and the
Chief Prosecutor of the Republic shall be elected by the plenary session of the Court
of Cassation by an absolute majority and by secret ballot.

The organization, functioning, and the qualifications of the Chairman, mem.
bers and other personnel of the Court of Cassation shall be regulated by law.

II. The Council of State

ARTICLE 140 - The Council of State is an administrative court of the first
instance in matters not referred by law to other administrative courts, and an admi-~
nistrative court of the last instance in general.

The Council of State shall hear and settle administrative disputes and suits,

shall express opinions on draft laws submitted by the Council of Ministers, shall
“examine draft regulations, specifications and contracts of concessions, and shall
discharge such other duties as prescribed by law.
I . 'The Chairman, members and the Chief Attorney of the Council of State shall
be elected from among individuals meeting the qualifications prescribed by law, by
a committee consisting of the permanent and alternate members of the Constituti-
onal Court. by secret ballot and a two thirds majority. If such majority is not obta~
ined in two ballotings, an abslute majority shall suffice.

In electing the Chairman, members, and the Chief Attorney of the Council
of State. the Council of Ministers and the General Assembly of the Council of State
shall each propose as many candidates as there are vacancies.
‘The organization, functioning and judicial procedure of the Council of State,
the qualifications and appointment. rights and duties, salaries and allowances. and
promotion of its members. the initiation of- disciplinary measures and the execution
or disciplinary penalties against such memes-e, shall be prescribed by law in accor-
dance with the principles of court independence and tenure of- judges.-
http://www.newocr.com/




39
Ill The Military Court of Cassaticm:
ARTICLE 141 _. The Military Court of Cassatipn. is a court .of. the last ins-
tance to review decisions and verdicts rendered by military courts. Furthermore, it
shall try.specitic cases ass} court of the- first and last. instance involving military
matters as prescribed by law.

The members and the Chief Prosecutor of the Military Court‘ of Cessation
shall be appointed by the President of the Republic from among three times as
many candidates as the available vacancies, who meet the qualifications required
for judgeship, have completed their fortieth year, have served for at least ten years
as military judges or prosecutors, and have been proposed by an absolute majority
of the plenary session of the Military Court of Cessation

The Military Court of Cassation shall elect its Chairman from among its own
members.

The organization, functioning, the judicial procedure of the Military Court
of Cassation and the disciplinary measures concerning its members shall be prescri-
bed by law acCording to the principles of court independence and tenure of judges.

IV. Court of Jurisdictional Disputes:

ARTICLE 142 - The Court of Jurisdictional Disputes is empowered to settle
definitively disputes among civil, administrative and military courts arising from
disagreements on jurisdictional matters and verdicts.

The organization and functioning of the Court of Jurisdictional Disputes shall
be regulated by law.“ This court shall be presided over by a member delegated by the
Constitutional.Court.from-.among- its; regular or alternate members.

C) SUPREME COUNCIL OF JUDGES

I. Organization:

ARTICLE 143 - The Supreme Council of Judges shall consist of eighteen
regular and five alternate members. Six of these members shall be elected by the
General Assembly of the Court of Cessation and six by judges of the first rank from
among themselves by secret ballot. The National Assembly and the Senate of the
Republic shall each elect threemembers by secret {ballot and a vote of absolute
majority of its plenary session, from among individuals who have served as judges
in the higher courts or qualified for membership in such courts. Under this system,
the General Assembly of the Court of Cessation. shall elect two alternate members,
while the judges of the first rank, the National Assembly and the Senate of the
Republic shall each elect one member.

The Supreme Council of Judges shall elect its Chairman from among its own'
members by a vote of absolute majority of its plenary session.

The term of office of members ofthe Supreme Council of Judges is four years,
and the election of half of them shangbe renewed every two years. Members elected
while serving as judges may not be 'renelected twice in succession. ' p
http://www.newocr.com/




40 
“The members of the SupremeCouncil 'ef Judges may not undertake-any-other
du‘tie’s br functions din-ingjtheir term 'in‘omce.‘
The organization. methods‘l'effprocedure (if-the :Supreme ' Council of “Judgegr
its diidsions,’ the functionsiafid the quorums for meetings and’decisions, 'the salaries
and allowances of the Chairman and members thereof shall be regulated by law.
The Minister of Justice may participate in the meetings of the Supreme Conn-
oil of Judges,_ but may not vote.
II. Emotions and powers:
ARTICLE 144 - The power to decide about all personnel matters of judges
rests with the Supreme Council of Judges. The decision to dismiss a judge from
judgeship for any reason whatsoever is taken by the absolute majority of the plenary
session of the General Assembly.
The Minister of Justice may, when he deems it necessary, appeal to the Sup-
reme Council of Judges in order to start disciplinary action against a judge.
The abolition of a court or staff positions, and changing the area of jurisdiction
of a court are dependent upon the approval of the Supreme Council of Judges.
The supervision of judges shall be exercised by high ranking judges to be
assigned by the Supreme Council of Judges for specific purpoées.
D) THE CONSTITUTIONAL COURT
I. Organization
a) Select-ion of members
ARTICLE 145 - The Constitutional Court consists of fifteen regular and
five alternate members. Four regular members are elected by the Court of. Cas-
sation. three by the General Assembly of the Council of State from among its own
Chairmen. members. the Chief Prosecutor and the Chief Attorney by the absolute
majority of its plenary session and by secret ballot; one member is elected by. the
Court7of Accounts from among its own Chairmen and members according to the
above procedure.
The National Assembly elects three, and. the Senate of, the Republic two
members; one of these is selected from among three candidates nominated by the
Military Court of Cessation by theabsolute majority of its plenary session and by
secret ballot. The Constitutional Court elects by secret ballot and a two-thirds
majority, a Chairman and a Vice-Chairman for four ’ years, from among its own
members; X‘s-election is permissible.
The legislative bodies shall elect these members from outside the. Turkish
Grand National Assembly by a two. thirds majority of their plenary sessiOns and
by secret ballot. If this majority is not obtained in the first ‘two ballotin'gs. then an
absolute majority shall suffice.
http://www.newocr.com/



40 
“The members of the SupremeCouncil 'ef Judges may not undertake-any-other
du‘tie’s br functions din-ingjtheir term 'in‘omce.‘
The organization. methods‘l'effprocedure (if-the :Supreme ' Council of “Judgegr
its diidsions,’ the functionsiafid the quorums for meetings and’decisions, 'the salaries
and allowances of the Chairman and members thereof shall be regulated by law.
The Minister of Justice may participate in the meetings of the Supreme Conn-
oil of Judges,_ but may not vote.
II. Emotions and powers:
ARTICLE 144 - The power to decide about all personnel matters of judges
rests with the Supreme Council of Judges. The decision to dismiss a judge from
judgeship for any reason whatsoever is taken by the absolute majority of the plenary
session of the General Assembly.
The Minister of Justice may, when he deems it necessary, appeal to the Sup-
reme Council of Judges in order to start disciplinary action against a judge.
The abolition of a court or staff positions, and changing the area of jurisdiction
of a court are dependent upon the approval of the Supreme Council of Judges.
The supervision of judges shall be exercised by high ranking judges to be
assigned by the Supreme Council of Judges for specific purpoées.
D) THE CONSTITUTIONAL COURT
I. Organization
a) Select-ion of members
ARTICLE 145 - The Constitutional Court consists of fifteen regular and
five alternate members. Four regular members are elected by the Court of. Cas-
sation. three by the General Assembly of the Council of State from among its own
Chairmen. members. the Chief Prosecutor and the Chief Attorney by the absolute
majority of its plenary session and by secret ballot; one member is elected by. the
Court7of Accounts from among its own Chairmen and members according to the
above procedure.
The National Assembly elects three, and. the Senate of, the Republic two
members; one of these is selected from among three candidates nominated by the
Military Court of Cessation by theabsolute majority of its plenary session and by
secret ballot. The Constitutional Court elects by secret ballot and a two-thirds
majority, a Chairman and a Vice-Chairman for four ’ years, from among its own
members; X‘s-election is permissible.
The legislative bodies shall elect these members from outside the. Turkish
Grand National Assembly by a two. thirds majority of their plenary sessiOns and
by secret ballot. If this majority is not obtained in the first ‘two ballotin'gs. then an
absolute majority shall suffice.
http://www.newocr.com/


41
Of the members to. ~ be. aestée by each legislative soar. es.e*-’§hell:-be 'v'selected
from among the candidates 1.191111118th in joint sesame wee teeshlee‘é-etefie' 9f the
Schools of Law, Economics, and Political Sciences or the gait-erases, by secret
ballot from-among a grOup of originally proposed candidates three times as many
as the vacant places.
A regular or alternate member of the Constitutional Court shall have comp-
leted his fortieth year and shall have served as Chairman. member, Chief Prosecutor
or Chief Attorney in the Court of Cassation or the Council of State, or the Military
Court of Cessation. or the Court of Accounts; or he shall have served on the teaching
staffs of the Schools of Law, Economics. or Political sciences of the universities for
at least five years; or he shall have practiced law for fifteen years.
The Court of Cessation shall elect two, and the Council of State. and each of
the legislative bodies one alternate member respectively to the Constitutional Court. 7
The procedure followed in the election of the alternate members shall'be the same
as in the case of the elections of regular members. , p
The members of the Constitutional Court shall undertake no public or private
functions. . i
b) Termination of membership
ARTICLE 146 - The members of the Constitutional Court shall be retired
at the age of sixty five. f
Membership in the Constitutional Court shall terminate by itself in the case
of a member being convicted of a crime entailingdismissal from judgeship; in case
it is definitely established that a member is incapable of discharging his duties for
reasons of health, membership shall be terminated by the absolute majority vote of
the plenary session of the Constitutional Court.
II. Function and powers
A ARTICLE 147 - The Constitutional Court shall .review the constitutionality
of laws and the By-laws of the Turkish Grand National Assembly.
The Constitutional Court shall try as a High Council.
http://www.newocr.com/



42
The Constitutional Court shall conduct its busineSs on the basis of written re»
cords, except in cases in which it acts as a High Court. However, when it deems
necessary, it may call the interested parties to present oral explanations.

IV. Annulment suits : I

a) Right of litigation

ARTICLE 149 - The President of the Republic, the political parties which
have obtained at least ten percent of the total valid ballots cast in the last elections,
or the political parties represented in the Turkish Grand National Assembly, or
their parliamentary groups, or one ‘sixth of all the mebers of one legislative body;
in cases concerning their duties and welfare, the Supreme Council of Judges, the
Court of Cassati’on, the Council of State, the Military Court of Cassation and the
universities may initiate annulment suits based on the unconstitutionality of laws,_
or of the By-laws of the Turkish Grand National Assembly or the specific articles
or provisions thereof.

b) The term of litigation

ARTICLE 150 - The right to introduce an annulment action directly to the
Constitutional Court is consumated after ninety days beginning with the promul-
gation of the contested law or By-laws in the Official Gazette.

c) The contention of unconstitutional-fly by other courts

ARTICLE 151 - A court ’which ‘ considers unconstitutional the provisions of
the relevant law or is convinced of the seriousness of the claim of unconstitutiona-
lity put forth by one of the parties,may postpone a case under consideration until
the Constitutional Court decides on the matter.

If the court doubts the seriousness of the claim of unconstitutionality, such
claim shall be decided upon by the upper court of review along with the main con.
tention.

The Constitutional Court shall decide on the matter within three months be-
ginning from the receipt of the contention.

7 If no decision is reached within this period, the court shall settle the claim
of unconstitutionality according to its own conviction. and shall thus decide on the
case under consideration. However, if the decision of the Constitutional Court arrives
before the judgment concerning the“~main case is finalized, the courts shall comply
therewith.

V. The rulings at the constitutional Court:

ARTICLE 152 - The -N milligram the :QohstitutignatCourt are final. .Theflaws
and byfla‘ws '_or their provisions which have been invalidated by the Constitutional
Court for unconstitutionality, shall become void from the date of the decision. The
Constitutional Court may. in pertinent eases, set the date of implementation of the
http://www.newocr.com/


43
annulment decision. Such date may not exceed six months beginning from the date
of decision.

The annulment decision is not retroactive.

The Constitutional Court may rule that its decisions based on the claims of
unconstitutionality coming from other courts are restricted in scope, or binding only
on the parties involved.

The decisions of the Constitutional Court shall be published im' pm: ediately in
the Official Gazette, and shall be binding on the legislative, executive, and judiciah

organs of the State, as well as on the administration, real and corporate persons.
P' A R T F O U R
Miscellaneous Provisions

1. Safeguard of the Reform Laws:

ARTICLE 153 - No provision of this Constitution shall be construed on inter-
preted as rendering unconstitutional the following Reform Laws which aim at raising
the Turkish society to the level of contemporary civilization and at safeguarding
the secular character of the Republic, which were in effect on the date this Constio
tution was adopted by popular vote

1. The Law on the unification of education, of March 3, 1340 (1924), No. 430.

2. The Hat Law, of November 25,1341 (1925); No. ,671.

3. The Law on the closing down of dervish convents, and mausoleums, and
the abolition of the office of keepers of tombs. and the Law on the abolition and!
prohibition of certain titles, cf November 30, 1941 (1925).

4. The conduct of the act of marriage according to article 110 of the Civil'
Code or February 17, 1926,1510. 743.

5. The Law concerning the adoption of international numerals of May 20,.
1928. No. 1288.

6. The Law concerning the adaption and application of the Turkish alphabet,
of November 1, 1928, No. 1353.

7. The Law on the abolition of titles and appellations such as eféndi. bey,
pasa, of November 26, 1934, No. 2590.

8. The Law concerning the prohibition to wear certain garments, 'of Decem-
ber 3, 1934, No. 2596.

II. The Office of Religious‘.iilfairs-: ‘. . ~ ‘ .' _ 7
ARTICLE 154 - The Office of Religious'Affair‘s. whimi'is incorporated in the
general administration, discharges the function prescribed by a special law.
http://www.newocr.com/



44
P-A-RT FIVE
Temporary Provisions
1;. The election, and convention of the Turkish'Grand National Assembly
i a) The joint elections of the National Assembly. and the Senate of. the Re-
pablie; the first session

TEMPORARY ARTICLE 1 - The elections for the National Assembly and
the Senate of the Republic, established according to this Constitution, shall be held.
on the same day.

On the fifth dayfollowing the publication of the election results by the High
Board of Election, both legislative bodies shall convene without summons in joint
session on the premises of the Turkish Grand National Assembly in Ankara at

15:00 hours. The eldest deputy shall preside over this meeting where the members
of the Senate of theRepublic shall first take the oath'followcd by the deputies.
b) The establishment of the Senate of the Republic:

TEMPORARY ARTICLE 2 - The first elections for the Senate of the Re-
public to be established accordingto this Constitution, shall be held for all the
members to be elected by general ballot.

The Senate of the Republic shall acquire legal status before the election of
the fifteen members to be elected by the President of the Republic. The President
shall elect these members within one month beginning from the date of his own
electionl

c) Provisional by-laws: p

TEMPORARY ARTICLE 3 - The provisions of the by-laws of the Turkish

Grand National Assembly which were in effect prior to October 27, 1957 , shall be
enforceable with respect to the sessions and activities of the Turkish Grand National
Assembly, National Assembly and the Senate of the Republic until the time these
bodies enact their oWn By-laws.

‘II. The termination of the legal status of the Constituent Assembly. the

National Unity Committee and the Assembly of Representatives; reform measures

TEMPORARY ARTICLE 4 - »With the convention of the Turkish Grand Na~
tional Assembly established pursuant to this Constitution, the Constituent Assembly,
the Committee of National Unity and the Assembly of Representatives established
according to Constitutional Act No. 491 of April 20, 1340 (1924) and Law No. 1 of

June 12. and Law No. 157 of December 13. 1960 shall loose their legal status and
dissolve by themselves.

No penal, financial or legal responsibility claim may be set forth before any
judicial authority with respect to the decisions and acts of the Committee 'of Na-
tional Unity and the revolutionary government which have exercised legislative and
http://www.newocr.com/


45

executive power on behalf of the Turkish nation from May 27,- 1960, until the. day
or convention of the Constituent Assembly on January 6, 1961, nor against the

administration, or authorized organs, which took decisions, acted upon and enforced
them accordingly.
The laws enacted between May 27. 1960, and January 6. 1961, with the purpose
of establishing a normal democratic regime with all its safeguards, shall be amended
or abolished only according to the rules applicable to the amendment and abolition
of all other laws of the Turkish Republic. However, no claim for annulment may be
set forth before the Constitutional Court regarding these laws on grounds of
unconstitu-tionality, neither may the assertion of unconstitutionality be raised as a
legal objection before courts.

In the event of amendment or abolition of the laws enacted or aetions under-
taken between May 27, 1960. and January 6. 1961, the provisions of paragraph 2 are
preserved.

III. The elect-ion of the President of the; Republic

TEMPORARY ARTICLE 5 .- The President of the Republic shall be elected
the day following the oath taking by the members of the Turkish Grand National
Assembly.

With the election of the President of the Republic the prerogatives cf the
Head of the State, established by Law No. 1 of June 12. 1960. shall terminate by
themselves. I

IV. The establishment of the Council of Ministers

TEMPORARY ARTICLE 6 - With the establishment of the new Council of
Ministers according to article 102 of this Constitution, the duties of the incumbent
Council of Mm sters established pursuant to Law No. 1 of June. 12, 1960, shall
terminate by themselves.

V. The organs, blatant-ions and councils prescribed by the Constitution:

a) The establishment of new} organs, institutions and councils: H

TEMPORARY ARTICLE 7 - The laws concerning the establishment and
activities of the new organs, institutions and councils prescribed by this Constitution
shall be enacted within six months at the latest, beginning from the first session
of the Turkish Grand National Assembly, the other laws stipulated by this Consti-
tution shall be enacted within a period not exceeding two years.

b) The status of. former organs, institutions and councils:

TEMPORARY ARTICLE 8 ~- The relevant provisions of existing laws shall
remain in force until the organizational laws concerning the establishnient and
functiOn-ing of the organs, institutions. and cOuncils to be established according to
this Constitution. Denome enforceable.
http://www.newocr.com/



46
c) The ruling on the constitutionality of previous legislation:
TEMPORARY ARTICLE 9 - No claim of unconstitutionality shall be set
forth before courts and no judgment shall be passed by courts on grounds of un-
constitutionality until notice of the establishment and activation. of the Constitu-
tional Court has been published in the Official Gazette.

Annulment action based on the unconstitutionality of a law, which was valid.
at the time the Constitutional Court began its activities. may be initiated. In such
«cases the right to file an annulment action shall terminate six months after the
activation of the Caustitutional Court has been announced in the Official Gazete.

VI. .Lot drawing atxthe first Senate of the Republic

TEMPORARY “ARTICLE 10 - The Senate members to be rotated two years
after their election shall be selected by‘ lot two months before election time in
accordance with paragraph .2 of article 73 concerning the rotation of the Senate
members elected by popular vote, and those Senate members appointed by the
President of the Republic; for those? members whose election term expires after
four years, lots are drawn by following the same procedure as above; however,
members elected at the end of the second year shall not participate in this lot
drawing.

The Chairman of the Senate of the Republic .shall not be subject to lot drawing.

The legal provisions concerning the election for the Senate of the Republic
shall be enforced during Senate election to be held two and four years after the
election of the first Senate of the Republic.

VII. The election rights of the amnestied

TEMPORARY ARTICLE 11 - Persons convicted by final verdict for non-
defamatory offenses and who have been pardoned by amnesty prior to the accep-
tance of the Constitution by popular vote shall not be deprived of the right to be
elected as prescribed by article 68.

P A R T S I X
Final Promsw’ ' ns‘
I. The amendment of the Constitution

ARTICLE 155 - Proposals for the amendment of the Constitution may be
submitted in writing by at least one third majority of the plenary session of the
Turkish Grand National Assembly, but may not be debated with urgency. An
amendment proposal shall be‘adopted by a two thirds majority vote of the plenary
session of each legislative body.

Outside of the requirements of paragraph 1. the debate and adoption of pro-
posals for the amendment of the Constitution are subject to the provisions governing
the debate and enactment of laws.
http://www.newocr.com/



47

II. Preamble and sub-titles of articles:

ARTICLE 156 - The Preamble which sets forth the basic views. and principles
on which” this Constitution rests, is an integral part of. the text of the Constitution.

The sub-titles of the articles refer only to the subjects of these articles. and
their order and relationship. These sub-titles are not a part of the text of the
Constitution.

III. E-ntrgfiin'f’oLVOi'ce of: the Constitution

ARTICLE 157 - Upon its approval by popular vote, this Constitution shall
become'the Constitution of the Turkish Republic, and shall be promulgated forthwith
in the Official Gazette together with the results of the referendum.

The provisions of the Constitution concerning the organization, election and
convention of the Turkish, Grand National Assembly shall enter into force subsequent

to promulgation according to paragraph 1; the other provisions shall take effect
after the election of the Turkish Grand National Assembly. in accordance with tho
principles set forth in the temporary articles.

fir

Excerpt from the decision number 106 of the Supreme Board of Election
concerning the results of the constitulional referendum

«It was established that on July 9. 1961, the day of the referendum, the total
number of eligible voters in Turkey was 12.735.009, and a total number of 10.322.169
voters cast their ballots. Of these 10.282.561 ballots were valid and 39.608 were
invalid. The number of those -voting for the Constitution totaled 6.348.191 and those
against it 3.934.370.»
http://www.newocr.com/
